Florida, session 2026, SB1248.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSection 704.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to 11 read: 12 704.08âCemeteries; right of ingress and egress for 13 visiting, or maintenance, research, and searches.â 14 (1)âThe relatives and descendants of any person buried in a 15 cemetery shall have an easement for ingress and egress for the 16 purpose of visiting the cemetery at reasonable times and in a 17 reasonable manner. The owner of the land may designate the 18 easement. If the cemetery is abandoned or otherwise not being 19 maintained, such relatives and descendants may request the owner 20 to provide for reasonable maintenance of the cemetery, and, if 21 the owner refuses or fails to maintain the cemetery, the 22 relatives and descendants shall have the right to maintain the 23 cemetery. 24 (2)âIf credible evidence supports a determination that 25 there is an abandoned cemetery located on, underneath, or 26 adjacent to land owned by a private owner, the state must be 27 granted an easement for ingress and egress for the purpose of 28 maintaining the cemetery and conducting research and noninvasive 29 searches at such cemetery at reasonable times and in a 30 reasonable manner after providing the owner with reasonable 31 notice. 32 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.